incubator/sl-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="ohišj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vir__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ih</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov,ki</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="poslanica__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pritisk__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="trajanj/e__n_nt">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="izolator__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jev</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ji</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="akt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ov</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bas__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="svetost__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="goljufij/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rab/a__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akt"><i>akt</i><par n="akt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="brk"><i>brk</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vodotok"><i>vodotok</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="trajanje"><i>trajanj</i><par n="trajanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="veleumnost"><i>veleumnost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bas"><i>bas</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="preobrazba"><i>preobrazb</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="goljufija"><i>goljufij</i><par n="goljufij/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pritisk"><i>pritisk</i><par n="pritisk__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zarod"><i>zarod</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oprema"><i>oprem</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="podplat"><i>podplat</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prepad"><i>prepad</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pošta"><i>pošt</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mat"><i>mat</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="junak"><i>junak</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="odtis"><i>odtis</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kontingent"><i>kontingent</i><par n="akt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrola"><i>kontrol</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="trup"><i>trup</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="uvedba"><i>uvedb</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="svoboda"><i>svobod</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dogovor"><i>dogovor</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prepir"><i>prepir</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kriterij"><i>kriterij</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="svečanost"><i>svečanost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="razdeljevanje"><i>razdeljevanj</i><par n="ohišj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="zajetnost"><i>zajetnost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vir"><i>vir</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="funkcionar"><i>funkcionar</i><par n="izolator__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="praznik"><i>praznik</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="svetost"><i>svetost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="priljubljenost"><i>priljubljenost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ohišje"><i>ohišj</i><par n="ohišj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="resnica"><i>resnic</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="certifikat"><i>certifikat</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="virus"><i>virus</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="vlaganje"><i>vlaganj</i><par n="trajanj/e__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="razred"><i>razred</i><par n="akt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sončnik"><i>sončnik</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="stisk"><i>stisk</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="zaskrbljenost"><i>zaskrbljenost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="demon"><i>demon</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="degradacija"><i>degradacij</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="podložnik"><i>podložnik</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="izolator"><i>izolator</i><par n="izolator__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="oddajnik"><i>oddajnik</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="poslanica"><i>poslanica</i><par n="poslanica__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="privilegij"><i>privilegij</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="konkurenca"><i>konkurenc</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="inšpektor"><i>inšpektor</i><par n="izolator__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="encim"><i>encim</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="popust"><i>popust</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="inflacija"><i>inflacij</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="raba"><i>rab</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="telekran"><i>telekran</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="depozit"><i>depozit</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="letnik"><i>letnik</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="demokracija"><i>demokracij</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="delež"><i>delež</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="organ"><i>organ</i><par n="vir__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="sebičnost"><i>sebičnost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nedorečenost"><i>nedorečenost</i><par n="svetost__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nalog"><i>nalog</i><par n="bas__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="koordinacija"><i>koordinacij</i><par n="rab/a__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="delničar"><i>delničar</i><par n="izolator__n_m"/></e>
